Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-603] Civil enforcement. (a) If
the commissioner believes that a person has engaged, is engaging, or is about
to engage in an act, practice, or course of business constituting a violation
of this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter or that a
person has, is, or is about to engage in an act, practice, or course of
business that materially aids a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted or
order issued under this chapter, the commissioner may maintain an action in a
court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin the act, practice, or course of
business, and to enforce compliance with this chapter or a rule adopted or
order issued under this chapter.

(b) In an action under this section and on a
proper showing, the court may:

(1) Issue a permanent or temporary injunction,
restraining order, or declaratory judgment;

(2) Order other appropriate or ancillary relief,
which may include:

(A) An asset freeze, accounting, writ of
attachment, writ of general or specific execution, and appointment of a
receiver or conservator, that may be the commissioner, for the defendant or the
defendant's assets;

(B) Ordering the commissioner to take charge
and control of a defendant's property, including investment accounts and
accounts in a depository institution, rents, and profits; to collect debts; and
to acquire and dispose of property;

(C) Imposing a civil penalty up to $50,000
for a single violation;

(D) Ordering rescission, restitution, or
disgorgement directed to a person that has engaged in an act, practice, or
course of business constituting a violation of this chapter or the predecessor
act or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter or the predecessor
act; and

(E) The payment of prejudgment and
postjudgment interest;

(3) Order the payment of costs and reasonable
attorney's fees; and

(4) Order such other relief as the court considers
appropriate.

(c) The commissioner shall not be required to
post a bond in an action or proceeding under this chapter.

(d) In an action under this section, the
commissioner may apply for and on due showing be entitled to have issued by the
court, a subpoena requiring forthwith the appearance of any defendant and the
defendant's employees, salespersons, or agents and the production of documents,
books, and records as may appear necessary for the hearing of such petition to
testify and give evidence concerning the acts or conduct or things complained
of in the application for the injunction. [L 2006, c 229, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next